California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 2.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10011.

“Licensee,” when used without modification, means a person, whether broker or salesperson, licensed under any of the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 7.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10012.

“Broker,” when used without modification, means a person licensed as a broker under any of the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 8.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10013.

“Salesperson,” when used without modification, means a person licensed as a salesperson under any of the provisions of this part. Whenever the word salesman is used in this division, or in the rules and regulations of the commissioner, it means salesperson. Notwithstanding any other law, a licensee may elect to refer to his or her licensed status as real estate salesman, real estate saleswoman, or real estate salesperson.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 9.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10014.

“Real estate licensee” means a person, whether broker or salesperson, licensed under Chapter 3 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 10.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.

“Real estate broker” means a person licensed as a broker under Chapter 3 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 11.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.1.

“Responsible broker” means the real estate broker responsible for the exercise of control and supervision of real estate salespersons under Section 10159.2, or a licensee subject to discipline under subdivision (h) of Section 10177 for failure to supervise activity requiring a real estate license. The supervision of a salesperson required under this part or any other law is limited to regulatory compliance and consumer protection.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 3.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.2.

“Manager” means a real estate licensee authorized to perform supervisorial services for a responsible broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 4.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.3.

“Broker associate” means a broker retained by a responsible broker who has authority to provide services requiring a real estate license on behalf of the responsible broker.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 5.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.4.

“Responsible broker’s identity” means the name under which the responsible broker is currently licensed by the department and conducts business in general or is a substantial division of the real estate firm, or both the name and the associated license identification number. “Responsible broker’s identity” does not include a fictitious business name obtained pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 10159.5 or the use of a team name pursuant to Section 10159.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 6.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10015.5.

“Professional identity” includes “responsible broker’s identity” and the identity under which the licensee is authorized to do business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 7.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10016.

“Real estate salesperson” means a natural person licensed as a salesperson under Chapter 3 of this part and who, for a compensation or in expectation of a compensation, is retained by a real estate broker to do one or more of the acts set forth in Sections 10131, 10131.1, 10131.2, 10131.3, 10131.4, and 10131.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 8.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.01.

“Retained” means the relationship between a broker and a licensee who is either an independent contractor affiliated with, or an employee of, a broker to perform activities that require a license and are performed under a broker’s supervision.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 9.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.02.

“Seller” means a transferor in a real property transaction, and includes an owner who lists real property with a licensee, whether or not a transfer results, or who receives an offer to purchase real property of which he or she is the owner from a licensee on behalf of another. “Seller” includes both a vendor and lessor of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 10.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.03.

“Listing agent” means a licensee who provides services requiring a real estate license for or on behalf of a seller pursuant to a listing agreement. Listing agent includes a seller’s agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 11.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.04.

“Seller’s agent” means a licensee who provides services requiring a real estate license for or on behalf of a seller. A seller’s agent may or may not be a listing agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 12.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.05.

“Buyer” means a transferee in a real property transaction, and includes a person who executes an offer to purchase real property from a seller through a licensee, whether or not a transfer results, or who seeks the services of a licensee in more than a casual, transitory, or preliminary manner, with the object of entering into a real property transaction. “Buyer” includes a purchaser, vendee, or lessee of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 13.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.06.

“Buyer’s agent” means a licensee who provides services requiring a real estate license for or on behalf of a buyer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 14.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.07.

“Real property” means any estate specified in (1) or (2) of Section 761 of the Civil Code in property, and includes (a) single-family residential property, (b) multiunit residential property with more than four dwelling units, (c) commercial real property, (d) vacant land, (e) a ground lease coupled with improvements, or (f) a manufactured home as defined in Section 18007 of the Health and Safety Code or a mobilehome as defined in Section 18008 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 15.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.08.

“Single-family residential property” or “Single-family residential real property” means: (a) real property improved with one to four dwelling units, including any leasehold exceeding one year’s duration of such, (b) a unit in a residential stock cooperative, condominium, or planned unit development, or (c) a mobilehome or manufactured home when offered for sale or sold through a real estate broker pursuant to Section 10131.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 16.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.09.

“Commercial real property” means all real property except (a) single-family residential real property, (b) dwelling units made subject to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Title 5 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, (c) a mobilehome as defined in Section 798.3 of the Civil Code, (d) vacant land, or (e) a recreational vehicle as defined in Section 799.29 of the Civil Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 17.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.10.

Except as provided in Section 10239.2, “sell,” “sale,” or “sold” means a transaction for the transfer of real property from a seller to a buyer, and includes (a) an exchange of real property between a seller and a buyer, (b) a real property sales contract within the meaning of Section 2985 of the Civil Code, and (c) a leasehold exceeding one year’s duration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 18.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.11.

“Dual agent” means an agent acting, either directly or through a salesperson or broker associate, as agent for both the seller and the buyer in a real property transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 19.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.13.

“Appraiser” means a person licensed or certified under Part 3 (commencing with Section 11300).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 20.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.14.

“Listing agreement” means a written contract between a seller of real property or a business opportunity and a real estate broker by which the broker has been authorized to sell the real property or find or obtain a buyer, including rendering other services for which a real estate license is required to the seller pursuant to the terms of the agreement. A “listing agreement” includes an “exclusive right to sell listing agreement,” “seller reserved listing agreement,” and “open listing agreement.”

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 21.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.15.

“Exclusive right to sell listing agreement” means a listing agreement whereby the owner grants to a seller’s agent, for a specified period of time, the exclusive right to sell, find, or obtain a buyer for the real property, and the seller’s agent is entitled to the agreed compensation if, during that period of time, the real property is sold, no matter who effected the sale, or when the seller’s agent receives and presents to the owner any enforceable offer from a ready, able, and willing buyer on terms that are authorized by the listing agreement or accepted by the owner. An “exclusive right to sell listing agreement” may provide for compensation to the seller’s agent if the property is sold within a specified period after termination of the listing agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 22.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.16.

“Seller reserved listing agreement” means a listing agreement whereby the owner grants to a seller’s agent, for a specified period of time, the exclusive right to sell, find, or obtain a buyer for the real property, and the seller’s agent is entitled to the agreed compensation if, during that period of time, the real property is sold, no matter who effected the sale, or when the seller’s agent receives and presents to the owner any enforceable offer from a ready, able, and willing buyer on terms that are authorized by the listing agreement or accepted by the owner. Compensation is not owed to the seller’s agent if the owner sells the property directly and not through any other broker. A “seller reserved listing agreement” may provide for compensation to the seller’s agent if the property is sold, other than directly by the
 seller, within a specified period after termination of the listing agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 23.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10018.17.

“Open listing agreement” means a listing agreement which grants no exclusive rights or priorities to the seller’s agent, and the agreed commission is payable to the seller’s agent only if that agent obtains and presents to the owner an enforceable offer from a ready, able, and willing buyer on the terms authorized by the listing agreement, which is accepted by the owner, before the property is otherwise sold either through another licensee or by the owner directly and before the listing agreement expires by its terms or is revoked by the seller’s agent or the owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 24.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10023.

“Mineral, oil, and gas licensee” means a person licensed under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 10500) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 14.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10024.

“Mineral, oil, and gas broker” means a person licensed as a broker under Chapter 7 of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 15.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10026.

(a) The term “advance fee,” as used in this part, is a fee, regardless of the form, that is claimed, demanded, charged, received, or collected by a licensee for services requiring a license, or for a listing, as that term is defined in Section 10027, before fully completing the service the licensee contracted to perform or represented would be performed. Neither an advance fee nor the services to be performed shall be separated or divided into components for the purpose of avoiding the application of this division.

(b) For the purposes of this section, the term “advance fee” does not include:

(1) “Security” as that term is used in Section 1950.5 of the Civil Code.

(2) A “screening fee” as that term is used in Section 1950.6 of the Civil Code.

(3) A fee that is claimed, demanded, charged, received, or collected for the purpose of advertising the sale, lease, or exchange of real estate, or of a business opportunity, in a newspaper of general circulation, any other written publication, or through electronic media comparable to any type of written publication, provided that the electronic media or the publication is not under the control or ownership of the broker.

(4) A fee earned for a specific service under a “limited service” contract. For purposes of this section, a “limited service” contract is a written agreement for real estate services described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 10131, and pursuant to which such services are promoted, advertised, or presented as stand-alone services, to be performed on a task-by-task basis, and for which compensation is received as each separate, contracted-for task is completed. To qualify for this exclusion, all services performed pursuant to the contract
 must be described in subdivision (a), (b), or (c) of Section 10131.

(c) A contract between a real estate broker and a principal that requires payment of a commission to the broker after the contract is fully performed does not represent an agreement for an advance fee.

(d) This section does not exempt from regulation the charging or collecting of a fee under Section 1950.5 or 1950.6 of the Civil Code, but instead regulates fees that are not subject to those sections.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 85, Sec. 2.   (AB 1762)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10027.

The term “listing” as used in this part includes, but is not limited to:

(a) The name or a list of the names, of the owners, landlords, exchangers, or lessors, or the location or locations, of property, or of an interest in property, offered for rent, sale, lease, or exchange, which may include a listing agreement.

(b) The name, or a list of the names, or the location or locations at which prospective or potential purchasers, buyers, lessees, tenants, or exchangers of property may be found or contacted, which may include a listing agreement.

(c) An agreement by which a person who is engaged in the business of promoting the sale or lease of business
 opportunities or real estate agrees to render to an owner or lessee of the property any services, to promote the sale or lease of that property.

(d) An agreement by which a person who is engaged in the business of finding, locating, or promoting the sale or lease of business opportunities or real estate, agrees to circularize, notify, or refer real estate brokers or salespersons to the property that is offered for sale or lease.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 285, Sec. 25.   (AB 2884)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10028.

“Trust deed” or “deed of trust” as used in this part includes “mortgage.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

10029.

“Real property sales contract” as used in this part is an agreement wherein one party agrees to convey title to real property to another party upon the satisfaction of specified conditions set forth in the contract and which does not require conveyance of title within one year from the date of formation of the contract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 886.)
-------------------------------------------

10030.

As used in this part, the words “business opportunity” shall include the sale or lease of the business and goodwill of an existing business enterprise or opportunity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 216.)
-------------------------------------------

10032.

(a) All obligations created under Section 10000, and following, all regulations issued by the commissioner relating to real estate salespersons, and all other obligations of brokers and real estate salespersons to members of the public shall apply regardless of whether the real estate salesperson and the broker to whom he or she is licensed have characterized their relationship as one of “independent contractor” or of “employer and employee.” 

(b) A real estate broker and a real estate salesperson licensed under that broker may contract between themselves as independent contractors or as employer and employee, for purposes of their legal relationship with and obligations to each other. Characterization of a relationship as either “employer and employee” or “independent contractor” for statutory purposes, including, but not limited to, withholding taxes on wages and for purposes of unemployment compensation, shall be governed by Section 650 and Sections 13000 to 13054, inclusive, of the Unemployment Insurance Code. For purposes of workers compensation the characterization of the relationship shall be governed by Section 3200, and following, of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10035.

Neither Section 10185 nor any other provision of this part which makes violation of this part a crime shall be construed to preclude application of any other criminal provision of the law of this state to an act or omission which constitutes a violation of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 57, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration [10050. - 10106.]



  ARTICLE 1. The Real Estate Commissioner [10050. - 10088.]

10050.

(a) (1) There is in the Business and Consumer Services Agency a Department of Real Estate, the chief officer of which department is named the Real Estate Commissioner.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the department, as set forth in this part and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this part and that chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2030.

(b) It shall be the principal responsibility of the commissioner to enforce all laws in this part and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 in a manner that achieves the maximum protection for the buyers of real
 property and those persons dealing with real estate licensees.

(c) Wherever the term “commissioner” is used in this division, it means the Real Estate Commissioner.

(d) The amendments made to this section by the act adding this subdivision shall become operative on July 1, 2026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 28, Sec. 3.   (SB 170)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

10050.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Department of Real Estate in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 712, Sec. 3.   (SB 706)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10051.

The commissioner shall be appointed by the Governor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 375.)
-------------------------------------------

10052.

The commissioner shall have been for five years a real estate broker actively engaged in business as such in California, or shall possess related experience associated with real estate activity in California for five years within the last 10 years.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 375.)
-------------------------------------------

10053.

The commissioner shall receive an annual salary as provided in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, to be paid monthly out of the State Treasury upon a warrant of the Controller, and shall be allowed his or her actual and necessary expenses in the discharge of his or her duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 18.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

10071.

The commissioner shall enforce the provisions of this part and of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2. The commissioner has full power to regulate and control the issuance and revocation, both temporary and permanent, of all licenses to be issued under the provisions of this part, and to perform all other acts and duties provided in this part and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 and necessary for their enforcement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 4.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10073.

The commissioner shall employ deputies, clerks, and employees as needed to discharge in the proper manner the duties imposed upon the commissioner by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 5.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10073.5.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for any employee, prospective employee, contractor, subcontractor, or volunteer whose duties include, or would include, access to criminal offender record information. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(b) (1) The department shall require a services contract, interagency agreement, or public entity agreement that includes, or would
 include, access to criminal offender record information to include a provision requiring the contractor to agree to perform criminal background checks on its employees and subcontractors who will have access to information described in subdivision (a) as part of their services contract, interagency agreement, or public entity agreement with the department.

(2) This subdivision shall only apply to a services contract, interagency agreement, or public entity agreement that is entered into, renewed, or amended on or after January 1, 2024.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Access” means the ability to view electronically or on paper.

(2) “Criminal offender
 record information” means the same as defined in Section 11075 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 198, Sec. 1.   (SB 152)   Effective September 13, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10074.

After qualifying as such neither the commissioner nor any of the deputies, clerks, or employees of the department shall be interested in any mineral, oil, or gas business, mineral, oil, or gas brokerage firm, real estate company or any real estate brokerage firm, as director, stockholder, officer, member, agent or employee, or act as a broker or salesperson, or act as a co-partner or agent for any broker or brokers, or
 salesperson or salespersons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 17.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10075.

Deputies, clerks and employees shall perform such duties as the commissioner shall assign to them.

Subject to the powers of the State Personnel Board and the Director of Finance, the commissioner shall fix the compensation of such deputies, clerks and employees, which compensation shall be paid monthly on a certificate of the commissioner, and on the warrant of the Controller out of the State Treasury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10076.

Each deputy shall, after his appointment, take and subscribe to the constitutional oath of office and file the same in the office of the Secretary of State.

Each clerk and employee shall take such oaths as may be required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10077.

The commissioner shall have his principal office in the City of Sacramento, and may establish branch offices in the City and County of San Francisco, the City of Los Angeles and in such other cities as the commissioner may deem necessary, subject to the approval of the Department of Finance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

10078.

(a) The commissioner shall adopt a seal with the words “Real Estate Commissioner State of California” and any other device as the commissioner may desire engraved thereon, by which the commissioner shall authenticate the proceedings of their office.

(b) Copies of all records and papers in the office of the commissioner certified under the hand and seal of the commissioner shall be received in evidence in all cases equally and with like effect as the originals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 6.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10079.

(a) The Attorney General shall render to the commissioner opinions upon all questions of law relating to the construction or interpretation of this part or Chapter 1 of Part 2 or arising in the administration thereof that may be submitted to him or her by the commissioner. Except as provided in subdivision (b), the Attorney General shall act as the attorney for the commissioner in all actions and proceedings
 brought by or against him or her under or pursuant to any of the provisions of this part or of Chapter 1 of Part 2.

(b) In the case of refusal by a licensee to obey a subpoena issued to that licensee, the commissioner may, by a noticed motion, apply to the superior court for, and the superior court may issue to the licensee, an order requiring the licensee to appear before the commissioner, or the representative designated by the commissioner, to produce documentary evidence, if so ordered, or to give evidence touching the matter under investigation or in question. Failure of the licensee to obey the order of the court may be punished by the court as a contempt.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.   (SB 53)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

10080.

The commissioner may adopt, amend, or repeal rules and regulations that are reasonably necessary for the enforcement of the provisions of this part and of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 of this division. The rules and regulations shall be adopted, amended, or repealed in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 77, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

10080.5.

In the event the commissioner employs the services of an agency engaged in the business of furnishing credit reports, such agency shall have been engaged in such business continuously in this State for a period of not less than five years prior to the time of such employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 660.)
-------------------------------------------

10080.9.

(a) If, upon inspection, examination, or investigation, the commissioner has cause to believe that a person who does not possess a real estate license is engaged or has engaged in activities for which a real estate license is required, or that a person who does not possess a prepaid rental listing service license or a real estate broker license is engaged or has engaged in activities for which a license
 is required pursuant to Section 10167.2, or that a licensee is violating or has violated any provision of this division or any rule or order thereunder, the commissioner or his or her designated representative may issue a citation to that person in writing, describing with particularity the basis of the citation. Each citation may contain an order to correct the violation or violations identified and a reasonable time period or periods by which the violation or violations must be corrected. In addition, each citation may assess an administrative fine not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), which shall be deposited into the Recovery Account of the Real Estate Fund and shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be available for expenditure for the purposes specified in Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 10470). In assessing a fine, the commissioner shall give due consideration to the appropriateness of the amount of the fine with respect to factors such as the gravity of the violation,
 the good faith of the person cited, and the history of previous violations. A citation issued and a fine assessed pursuant to this section, while constituting discipline for a violation of the law, shall be in lieu of other administrative discipline by the commissioner for the offense or offenses cited, and the citation against and payment of any fine by a licensee shall not be reported as disciplinary action taken by the commissioner.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), nothing in this section shall prevent the commissioner from issuing an order to desist and refrain from engaging in a specific business activity or activities or an order to suspend all business operations to a person who is engaged in or has engaged in continued or repeated violations of this part. In any of these circumstances, the sanctions authorized under this section shall be separate from, and in addition to, all other administrative, civil, or criminal penalties.

(c) If, within 30 days from the receipt of the citation or the citation and fine, the person cited fails to notify the commissioner that he or she intends to request a hearing as described in subdivision (d), the citation or the citation and fine shall be deemed final.

(d) Any hearing under this section shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(e) After the exhaustion of the review procedures provided for in this section, the commissioner may apply to the appropriate superior court for a judgment in the amount of any administrative penalty imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) and an order compelling the person cited to comply with the order of the commissioner. The application, which shall include a certified copy of the
 final order of the commissioner, shall constitute a sufficient showing to warrant issuing the judgment and order.

(f) Failure of any person to comply with the terms of a citation or pay a fine assessed pursuant to this section, within a reasonable period specified by the commissioner, shall subject that person to disciplinary action by the commissioner. In no event may a license be issued or renewed if an unpaid fine remains outstanding or the terms of a citation have not been complied with.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 177, Sec. 18.   (AB 685)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

10081.

(a) Whenever the commissioner believes from evidence satisfactory to him that any person has violated or is about to violate any of the provisions of this part or of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 or any order, license, permit, decision, demand or requirement, or any part or provision thereof, he or she may bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California in the superior court of the State of California against that person to enjoin him or her from continuing the violation or engaging therein or doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof.

In this
 action an order or judgment may be entered awarding such preliminary or final injunction as may be proper, but no preliminary injunction or temporary restraining order shall be granted without at least five days’ notice to the defendant.

If the commissioner makes a showing satisfactory to the court that the violations or threatened violations jeopardize funds and properties of others in the custody or under the control of the defendant, the court may appoint a receiver for management of the business of the defendant, including, but not limited to, the funds and properties of others in his or her possession or may make any other order as it deems appropriate to protect and preserve those funds and properties.

The order appointing the receiver shall specify the source of the funds for payment of the fees of the receiver and the costs attributable to administering the receivership. Unless provided for in the order, the
 commissioner shall not be liable for payment of the fees or costs.

(b) The commissioner may include in any action authorized by subdivision (a), a claim for restitution on behalf of the persons injured by the act or practice constituting the subject matter of the action, and the court shall have jurisdiction to award appropriate relief to such persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 468, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10081.5.

Whenever the commissioner believes from evidence satisfactory to him or her that any real estate licensee has violated or is about to violate, the provisions of Section 10145, the commissioner may bring an action in the name of the people of the State of California, in the superior court of the State of California, to enjoin the licensee from continuing the violation or engaging therein or doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof.

In the event the commissioner has conducted an audit which reflects commingling or conversion of trust funds in excess of ten thousand dollars ($10,000), the court may enter an
 order restraining the licensee from doing any act or acts in furtherance thereof, and from further exercising the privileges of his or her license pending further order of the court, provided that a hearing shall be held on the order within five days after the date thereof.

After such hearing in the manner provided by law, an order may be entered appointing a receiver, or such other order as the court may deem proper. The order appointing the receiver shall specify the source of the funds from which the fees of the receiver and the costs of administering the receivership are to be paid. Unless provided for in the order, the commissioner shall not be liable for payment of the fees or costs.

A receiver appointed by the court pursuant to this section may, with the approval of the court, exercise all of the powers of the licensee or its officers, directors, partners, trustees, or persons who exercise similar powers and perform
 similar duties, including the filing of a petition for bankruptcy of the licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 468, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10082.

The commissioner may publish or cause to be published at appropriate intervals a directory or list of licensed brokers and salespersons and may publish therewith any matter as the commissioner may deem pertinent to this part and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2. The commissioner shall furnish one copy of the directory to each licensed broker upon request and payment of an appropriate charge based upon the cost of publication. The directory may contain copies of this part and Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2 and the rules and regulations of the commissioner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 786, Sec. 7.   (SB 774)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10083.

The commissioner may periodically issue a bulletin containing matter relating to the department, and to the provisions of this part and of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Part 2, and the administration thereof, and may publish the same character of matter in any established periodical published in the state which in his opinion would be most likely to disseminate such matter and information to licensees under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

10083.2.

(a) (1) The commissioner shall provide information on the internet regarding the status of every license issued by the department in accordance with the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code).

(2) The public information to be provided on the internet shall include information on suspensions and revocations of licenses issued by the department and accusations filed pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) relative to persons or
 businesses subject to licensure or regulation by the department.

(3) The public information shall not include personal information, including home telephone number, date of birth, or social security number. The commissioner shall disclose a licensee’s address of record. However, the commissioner shall allow a licensee to provide a post office box number or other alternate address, instead of the licensee’s home address, as the address of record. This section shall not preclude the commissioner from also requiring a licensee who has provided a post office box number or other alternative mailing address as the licensee’s address of record to provide a physical business address or residence address only for the department’s internal administrative use and not for disclosure as the licensee’s address of record or disclosure on the internet.

(4) The public information shall also